New York, session 2025-2026, A4311.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 2 335-d to read as follows: 3 § 335-d. Two generation pilot program. 1. Subject to appropriation, 4 the commissioner of the office of temporary and disability assistance in 5 cooperation with the commissioner of the office of children and family 6 services, the commissioner of mental health and the commissioner of 7 health shall establish a pilot program to promote family stability and 8 children's school readiness in up to six local social services 9 districts. Such program, subject to the rules and regulations of the 10 commissioner, shall consist of services for families with children up to 11 age six who are recipients of public assistance. The commissioner shall 12 select by a competitive bid or request for proposal process, organiza- 13 tions with expertise in adult education and workforce preparation 14 programs, programs that provide information about appropriate nutrition 15 and medical services for new mothers and young children, and child 16 development programs, including early care, early education, and home 17 visiting. Such services shall be provided in a coordinated effort with a 18 focus on serving families through an integrated, multi-generational 19 approach. Nothing herein shall prohibit organizations from working in 20 joint collaboration when delivering services to families in accordance 21 with this section. 22 2. Such program shall be designed to achieve the following outcomes: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07190-01-5 A. 4311 2 1 (a) increased financial stability of families including increased 2 earning potential of parents; 3 (b) improved school readiness of children; 4 (c) increased access for parents and children to programs that foster 5 healthy parent-child relationships; and 6 (d) increased access for all family members to participate in programs 7 that address the mental and physical health needs of parents and chil- 8 dren. 9 3. Such programs shall be further designed to utilize funding for 10 services including but not limited to personalized parent support 11 services aimed at maintaining parental engagement and overcoming obsta- 12 cles to achieve program outcomes. 13 4. Each organization participating in the pilot program established 14 under this section shall submit annual project data pertaining to the 15 number of children screened through standardized developmental or 16 social-emotional screening, the number of parents who were unemployed 17 prior to participation in the program who since obtained employment as a 18 result of the program, the number of parents who increased their educa- 19 tion level and specific credentials obtained and the number of parents 20 who were employed at the beginning of their participation in the pilot 21 program, whether their earnings have increased as a result of their 22 participation and any other data or information determined to be rele- 23 vant for the understanding, implementation and outcomes of the pilot 24 program. 25 5. The locations of the participating organizations under the pilot 26 program shall be geographically disbursed throughout the state and 27 determined by the commissioner based on the number of public assistance 28 recipients in a given county, counties with high rates of unemployment 29 or underemployment and counties that lack access to comparable services. 30 6. The duration of a project undertaken by an organization participat- 31 ing in the pilot program established under this section shall be at 32 least one year and no more than four years. 33 7. Thirty months after the effective date of this section, and upon 34 the conclusion of the pilot program, the commissioners shall submit a 35 report to the governor, the temporary president of the senate, the 36 speaker of the assembly and the early childhood advisory council estab- 37 lished under section four hundred eighty-three-g of this chapter, 38 analyzing the data provided by the participating organization, as well 39 as recommendations based on the outcomes of the pilot program. 40 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 41 have become a law and shall expire 5 years after such effective date 42 when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be deemed repealed.